en: Roulette Wheels & Sets
xx: Roulette Wheels & Sets
cs: Rulety a sady
da: Roulettehjul og -sæt
de: Rouletteräder & -zubehör
es: Juegos y ruedas para ruletas
fr: Jeux de roulette
it: Set e ruote per roulette
ja: ルーレット
nl: Roulettewielen en -sets
no: Ruletthjul og -sett
pl: Zestawy i koła do gry w ruletkę
pt: Roleta
ru: Колеса и наборы для рулетки
sv: Rouletthjul och -set
tr: Rulet Tekerlekleri ve Setleri

en: Slot Machines
xx: Slot Machines
cs: Dětské hrací automaty
da: Spillemaskiner
de: Glücksspielautomaten
es: Máquinas tragaperras
fr: Machines à sous
it: Slot machine
ja: スロットマシーン
nl: Fruitautomaten
no: Spilleautomater
pl: Automaty wrzutowe
pt: Caça-níqueis
ru: Слот-машины
sv: Spelautomater
tr: Slot Makineleri

en: Tile Games
xx: Tile Games
cs: Skládačky
da: Brikspil
de: Legespiele
es: Juegos de fichas
fr: Jeux de mosaïques
it: Giochi di società
ja: タイルゲーム
nl: Schuifpuzzels
no: Rutespill
pl: Gry z żetonami
pt: Jogos com peças e dados
ru: Игры с костяшками
sv: Brickspel
tr: Döşeme Oyunları

en: Outdoor Play Equipment
xx: Outdoor Play Equipment
cs: Venkovní hračky
da: Udelegetøj
de: Spielzeug für draußen
es: Estructuras para juegos al aire libre
fr: Jeux de plein air
it: Attrezzatura gioco outdoor
ja: 屋外遊具
nl: Apparaten voor buiten spelen
no: Utstyr for utendørsleker
pl: Zabawki ogrodowe
pt: Equipamento para brincadeiras ao ar livre
ru: Оборудование для игр на открытом воздухе
sv: Utrustning för utomhuslek
tr: Açık Hava Oyunu Ekipmanları

en: Inflatable Bouncer Accessories
xx: Inflatable Bouncer Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke skákacím hradům
da: Tilbehør til hoppeborge
de: Hüpfburg-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para castillos hinchables
fr: Accessoires pour structures gonflables
it: Accessori per strutture gonfiabili da salto
ja: バウンスハウス関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor springkastelen
no: Tilbehør til oppblåsbare hoppeslott
pl: Akcesoria do zamków dmuchanych
pt: Acessórios para brinquedos infláveis
ru: Принадлежности для надувных воздушных замков
sv: Hoppborgstillbehör
tr: Şişme Ev Aksesuarları

en: Inflatable Bouncers
xx: Inflatable Bouncers
cs: Skákací hrady
da: Hoppeborge
de: Hüpfburgen
es: Castillos hinchables
fr: Structures gonflables
it: Strutture gonfiabili da salto
ja: バウンスハウス
nl: Springkussens
no: Hoppeslott
pl: Zamki dmuchane
pt: Castelos infláveis
ru: Надувные воздушные замки
sv: Hoppborgar
tr: Şişme Evler

en: Inflatable toys
ar: ألعاب قابلة للنفخ
as: ফুলাব পৰা খেলনা
az: Şişmə oyuncaqlar
be: Надзіманыя цацкі
bg: Надуваеми играчки
bn: ইনফ্ল্যাটেবল খেলনা
cs: Nafukovací hračky
da: Oppusteligt legetøj
de: Aufblasbares Spielzeug
el: Φουσκωτά παιχνίδια
es: Juguetes inflables
et: Täispuhutavad mänguasjad
fa: اسباب بازی های بادی
fi: Puhallettavat lelut
fr: Jouets gonflables
ga: Bréagáin inséidte
gu: ફુલાવી શકાય તેવા રમકડાં
hi: inflatable खिलौने
hr: Igračke na napuhavanje
hu: Felfújható játékok
hy: Փչովի խաղալիքներ
id: Mainan tiup
is: Uppblásanlegt leikföng
it: Giocattoli gonfiabili
ja: インフレータブルおもちゃ
jw: Dolanan kembung
ka: გასაბერი სათამაშოები
kk: Үрлемелі ойыншықтар
km: ប្រដាប់ប្រដាក្មេងលេងដែលអាចបំប៉ោងបាន
kn: ಗಾಳಿ ತುಂಬುವ ಆಟಿಕೆಗಳು
ko: 팽창식 장난감
ky: Үйлөмө оюнчуктар
lt: Pripučiamos žaislai
lv: Piepūšamās rotaļlietas
mk: Играчки на надувување
ml: കാറ്റിൽ നിറയ്ക്കാവുന്ന കളിപ്പാട്ടങ്ങൾ
mn: Үлээдэг тоглоомууд
mr: फुगवता येणारे खेळणी
ms: Mainan kembung
mt: Ġugarelli li jintefħu
my: လေထိုးအရုပ်များ
ne: हावा भर्ने खेलौनाहरू
nl: Opblaasbaar speelgoed
no: Oppblåsbare leker
or: ଫୁଲାଇବା ଯୋଗ୍ୟ ଖେଳନା
pa: ਇਨਫਲੇਟੇਬਲ ਖਿਡੌਣੇ
pl: Nadmuchiwane zabawki
ps: د پړسوب وړ لوبو
pt: Brinquedos infláveis
ro: Jucării gonflabile
ru: Надувные игрушки
sd: انفليٽيبل رانديون
si: පිම්බෙන සෙල්ලම් බඩු
sk: Nafukovacie hračky
sl: Napihljive igrače
so: Alaabta lagu buufiyo
sq: Lodra të fryra
sr: Играчке на надувавање
sv: Uppblåsbara leksaker
sw: Vinyago vinavyoweza kuingizwa hewa
ta: ஊதக்கூடிய பொம்மைகள்
te: గాలితో నింపబడిన బొమ్మలు
tg: Бозичаҳои пуфшаванда
th: ของเล่นเป่าลม
tk: Püşürilýän oýunjaklar
tl: Mga laruang inflatable
tr: Şişme oyuncaklar
uk: Надувні іграшки
ur: افراط پذیر کھلونے
uz: Shishiriladigan o'yinchoqlar
vi: Đồ chơi bơm hơi
xh: Amathoyizi anokufakwa umoya
yo: Awọn nkan isere inflatable
zh: 充气玩具
zu: Amathoyizi angeniswayo

en: Play Swings
xx: Play Swings
cs: Houpačky
da: Gynger
de: Schaukeln
es: Columpios y balancines
fr: Balançoires
it: Altalene e dondoli
ja: ブランコ
nl: Schommels en glijbanen
no: Husker
pl: Huśtawki i bujaki
pt: Balanços
ru: Качели
sv: Gungor
tr: Salıncak Koltuklar

en: Play Tents & Tunnels
xx: Play Tents & Tunnels
cs: Stany na hraní a prolézací tunely
da: Legetelte og -tunneller
de: Spielzelte & -tunnel
es: Tiendas y túneles de juego
fr: Tentes et tunnels d'activités
it: Tende e tunnel giocattolo
ja: プレイテント・プレイトンネル
nl: Speeltenten en -tunnels
no: Leketelt og -tunneler
pl: Namioty i tunele dla dzieci
pt: Tendas e túneis de brinquedo
ru: Игровые палатки и туннели
sv: Leksakstält och tunnlar
tr: Oyuncak Çadır ve Tüneller

en: Playhouses
xx: Playhouses
cs: Dětské domečky
da: Legehuse
de: Spielhäuser
es: Casitas infantiles
fr: Maisonnettes et tentes de jeu
it: Playhouse
ja: プレイハウス
nl: Speelhuizen
no: Lekestuer
pl: Domki do zabawy
pt: Casas de brinquedo
ru: Домики для детей
sv: Lekstugor
tr: Oyun Evleri

en: Pogo Sticks
xx: Pogo Sticks
cs: Skákadla pogo
da: Kængurustylter
de: Springstöcke
es: Saltadores
fr: Bâtons sauteurs
it: Trampoli con molla
ja: ホッピング・ポゴスティック
nl: Pogosticks
no: Hoppestokker
pl: Drążki pogo
pt: Bastões pula-pula
ru: Пого-стики
sv: Kängurustyltor
tr: Zıplama Sırıkları

en: Sandboxes
xx: Sandboxes
cs: Pískoviště
da: Sandkasser
de: Sandkästen
es: Cajones de arena
fr: Bacs à sable
it: Sabbionaie
ja: 砂場
nl: Zandbakken
no: Sandkasser
pl: Piaskownice
pt: Caixas de areia
ru: Песочницы
sv: Sandlådor
tr: Kum Havuzları

en: See Saws
xx: See Saws
cs: Pákové houpačky
da: Vipper
de: Wippen
es: Subibajas
fr: Balançoires à bascule
it: Altalene basculanti
ja: シーソー
nl: Wippen
no: Dumphusker
pl: Huśtawki
pt: Gangorras
ru: Качалки-балансиры
sv: Gungbrädor
tr: Tahterevalliler

en: Slides
xx: Slides
cs: Skluzavky
da: Rutsjebaner
de: Rutschen
es: Toboganes
fr: Toboggans
it: Scivoli
ja: すべり台
nl: Glijbaan
no: Sklier
pl: Zjeżdżalnie
pt: Escorregadores
ru: Горки
sv: Rutschkanor
tr: Kaydıraklar

en: Stilts
xx: Stilts
cs: Skákací chůdy
da: Hoppestylter
de: Stelzen
es: Zancos de salto
fr: Échasses, Échasse
it: Trampoli da salto
ja: ジャンピングシューズ
nl: Springstelten
no: Stylter
pl: Szczudła sprężynowe
pt: Varas para salto
ru: Прыгающие ходули
sv: Styltor
tr: Zıplama Ayaklıkları

en: Swing Set & Playset Accessories
xx: Swing Set & Playset Accessories
cs: Houpačky a dětská hřiště – příslušenství
da: Gyngestativer og legestativer – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Schaukeln & Spielplatzgeräte
es: Accesorios para columpios y estructuras de juegos
fr: Accessoires pour balançoires et portiques
it: Set altalena e accessori per set di gioco
ja: 屋外遊具セット関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor schommel- en speelsets
no: Tilbehør til huskesett og lekesett
pl: Akcesoria do huśtawek i placów zabaw
pt: Acessórios para balanços e brinquedos ao ar livre
ru: Принадлежности для качелей и детских городков
sv: Tillbehör till gung- och lekplatssystem
tr: Salıncak Seti ve Oyun Seti

en: Swing Sets & Playsets
xx: Swing Sets & Playsets
cs: Houpačky a dětská hřiště
da: Gyngestativer og legestativer
de: Schaukeln & Spielplatzgeräte
es: Columpios y estructuras de juegos
fr: Balançoires et portiques
it: Set altalena e set di gioco
ja: 屋外遊具セット
nl: Schommel- en speelsets
no: Huskesett og lekesett
pl: Zestawy huśtawek i placów zabaw
pt: Conjuntos de balanços e brinquedos ao ar livre
ru: Качели и детские городки
sv: Gung- och lekplatssystem
tr: Salıncak Setleri ve Oyun Setleri

en: Trampoline Accessories
xx: Trampoline Accessories
cs: Trampolíny – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til trampoliner
de: Trampolinzubehör
es: Accesorios para camas elásticas
fr: Accessoires de trampolines
it: Accessori trampolini
ja: トランポリン関連用品
nl: Trampolineaccessoires
no: Trampolinetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do trampolin
pt: Acessórios para trampolim
ru: Принадлежности для батутов
sv: Tillbehör till studsmattor
tr: Trambolin Aksesuarları

en: Trampolines
xx: Trampolines
cs: Trampolíny
da: Trampoliner
de: Trampoline
es: Camas elásticas
fr: Trampolines
it: Trampolini
ja: トランポリン
nl: Trampolines
no: Trampoliner
pl: Trampoliny
pt: Camas elásticas
ru: Батуты
sv: Studsmattor
tr: Trambolinler

en: Water Play Equipment
xx: Water Play Equipment
cs: Vybavení na vodní hry
da: Vandleg – udstyr
de: Wasserspielgeräte
es: Equipos para juegos acuáticos
fr: Accessoires pour jeux d'eau
it: Attrezzature per gioco in acqua
ja: 水遊び
nl: Waterspeelgoed
no: Utstyr til vannleker
pl: Zabawki do wody
pt: Equipamento para brincadeiras na água
ru: Приспособления для водных игр
sv: Utrustning för vattenlek
tr: Su Oyunları Ekipmanları